Utah statutes.
53A-11-201.   Rules for examinations prescribed by Department of Health -- Notification of impairment.

(1) (a)  Each local school board shall implement rules as prescribed by the Department of Health for vision, dental, abnormal spinal curvature, and hearing examinations of students attending the district's schools.

(b)  Under guidelines of the Department of Health, qualified health professionals shall provide instructions, equipment, and materials for conducting the examinations.

(c)  The rules shall include exemption provisions for students whose parents or guardians contend the examinations violate their personal beliefs.

(2)  The school shall notify, in writing, a student's parent or guardian of any impairment disclosed by the examinations.



Amended by Chapter 4, 1996 General Session

